North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 7. Administrative Offices.

Part 1. Organization and Reorganization of City Government.

§ 160A-146.
Council to organize city government.

The council may create, change, abolish, and consolidate offices, positions, departments, boards, commissions, and agencies of the city government and generally organize and reorganize the city government in order to promote orderly and efficient administration of city affairs, subject to the following limitations:

The council may not abolish any office, position, department, board, commission, or agency established and required by law;

The council may not combine offices or confer certain duties on the same officer when such action is specifically forbidden by law;

The council may not discontinue or assign elsewhere any functions or duties assigned by law to a particular office, position, department, or agency.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Local Modification.

City of Charlotte: 1973, c. 330.

§ 160A-147.
Appointment of city manager; dual office holding.

In cities whose charters provide for the council-manager form of government, the council shall appoint a city manager to serve at its pleasure. The manager shall be appointed solely on the basis of the manager’s executive and administrative qualifications. The manager need not be a resident of the city or State at the time of appointment. The office of city manager is hereby declared to be an office that may be held concurrently with other appointive (but not elective) offices pursuant to Article VI, Sec. 9, of the Constitution.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a city manager may serve on a county board of education that is elected on a non-partisan basis if the following criteria are met:

The population of the city by which the city manager is employed does not exceed 10,000;

The city is located in two counties; and

The population of the county in which the city manager resides does not exceed 40,000.

(b1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a city manager may serve on a county board of education that is elected on a nonpartisan basis if the population of the city by which the city manager is employed does not exceed 3,000.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a city manager may hold elective office if the following criteria are met:

The population of the city by which the city manager is employed does not exceed 3,000.

The city manager is an elected official of a city other than the city by which the city manager is employed.

For the purposes of this section, population figures shall be according to the latest United States decennial figures issued at the time the second office is assumed. If census figures issued after the second office is assumed increase the city or county population beyond the limits of this section, the city manager may complete the term of elected office that the city manager is then serving.

History.

1969, c. 629, s. 2; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1989, c. 49; 1997-25, s. 1; 2009-321, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Town of Elon College: 1985, c. 109; (As to Part 2) town of Kernersville: 1989, c. 381, s. 12.

§ 160A-148.
Powers and duties of manager.

The manager shall be the chief administrator of the city. The manager shall be responsible to the council for administering all municipal affairs placed in the manager’s charge by the council, and shall have the following powers and duties:

He shall appoint and suspend or remove all city officers and employees not elected by the people, and whose appointment or removal is not otherwise provided for by law, except the city attorney, in accordance with such general personnel rules, regulations, policies, or ordinances as the council may adopt.

He shall direct and supervise the administration of all departments, offices, and agencies of the city, subject to the general direction and control of the council, except as otherwise provided by law.

He shall attend all meetings of the council and recommend any measures that he deems expedient.

He shall see that all laws of the State, the city charter, and the ordinances, resolutions, and regulations of the council are faithfully executed within the city.

He shall prepare and submit the annual budget and capital program to the council.

He shall annually submit to the council and make available to the public a complete report on the finances and administrative activities of the city as of the end of the fiscal year.

He shall make any other reports that the council may require concerning the operations of city departments, offices, and agencies subject to his direction and control.

He shall perform any other duties that may be required or authorized by the council.

The manager shall receive a minimum of six clock hours of education upon the occurrence, or within six months of the occurrence, of any of the following:

The Local Government Commission is exercising its authority under Article 10 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes with respect to the city.

The city has received a unit letter from the Local Government Commission due to a deficiency in complying with Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

The city has an internal control material weakness or significant deficiency in the most recently completed financial audit.

The city is included on the most recently published Unit Assistance List issued by the Department of State Treasurer.

The education shall incorporate fiscal management and the requirements of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes. The education may be provided by the Local Government Commission, the School of Government at the University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Community College System, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, or other qualified sources at the choice of the governing board and upon the prior approval of the Local Government Commission. The clerk to the governing board shall maintain a record verifying receipt of the education by the manager and shall provide this information, upon request, to the Secretary of the Local Government Commission.

History.

1969, c. 629, s. 2; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 22; 2021-124, s. 5.

Local Modification.

Town of Tryon: 2013-261, s. 4 (as to subdivision (1)).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-124, s. 5, effective August 30, 2021, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), substituted “the manager’s charge” for “his charge” and substituted “the council” for “them”; added subdivision (a)(9); and added subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Putting Amotion in Motion: Removal of an Elected Official by a Municipal Governing Body for Just Cause,” see 32 Campbell L. Rev. 75 (2009).

§ 160A-149.
Acting city manager.

By letter filed with the city clerk, the manager may designate, subject to the approval of the council, a qualified person to exercise the powers and perform the duties of manager during his temporary absence or disability. During this absence or disability, the council may revoke that designation at any time and appoint another to serve until the manager returns or his disability ceases.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-150.
Interim city manager.

When the position of city manager is vacant, the council shall designate a qualified person to exercise the powers and perform the duties of manager until the vacancy is filled.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-151.
Mayor and councilmen ineligible to serve or act as manager.

Neither the mayor nor any member of the council shall be eligible for appointment as manager or acting or interim manager.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-152.
Applicability of Part.

This Part shall apply only to those cities having the council-manager form of government. If the powers and duties of a city manager set out in any city charter shall differ materially from those set out in

G.S. 160A-148

, the council may by ordinance confer or impose on the manager any of the powers or duties set out in

G.S. 160A-148

but not contained in the charter.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§§ 160A-153,
160A-154.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Administration of Mayor-Council Cities.

§ 160A-155.
Council to provide for administration in mayor-council cities.

The council shall appoint, suspend, and remove the heads of all city departments, and all other city employees; provided, the council may delegate to any administrative official or department head the power to appoint, suspend, and remove city employees assigned to his department. The head of each department shall see that all laws of the State, the city charter, and the ordinances, resolutions, and regulations of the council concerning his department are faithfully executed within the city. Otherwise, the administration of the city shall be performed as provided by law or direction of the council.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, s. 16.

§ 160A-156.
Acting department heads.

By letter filed with the city clerk, the head of any department may designate, subject to the approval of the council, a qualified person to exercise the powers and perform the duties of head of that department during his temporary absence or disability. During his absence or disability, the council may revoke that designation at any time and appoint another officer to serve until the department head returns or his disability ceases.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-157.
Interim department heads.

When the position of head of any department is vacant, the council may designate a qualified person to exercise the powers and perform the duties of head of the department until the vacancy is filled.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-158.
Mayor and councilmen ineligible to serve or act as heads of departments.

Neither the mayor nor any member of the council shall be eligible for appointment as head of any city department or as acting or interim head of a department; provided, that in cities having a population of less than 5,000 according to the most recent official federal census, the mayor and any member of the council shall be eligible for appointment by the council as department head or other employee, and may receive reasonable compensation for such employment, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, s. 17.

§ 160A-159.
Applicability of Part.

This Part shall apply only to those cities having the mayor-council form of government.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§§ 160A-160,
160A-161.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Personnel.

§ 160A-162.
Compensation.

The council shall fix or approve the schedule of pay, expense allowances, and other compensation of all city employees, and may adopt position classification plans; any compensation or pay plan may include provisions for payments to employees on account of sickness or disability. In cities with the council-manager form of government, the manager shall be responsible for preparing position classification and pay plans for submission to the council and, after any such plans have been adopted by the council, shall administer them. In cities with the mayor-council form of government, the council shall appoint a personnel officer (or confer the duties of personnel officer on some city administrative officer); the personnel officer shall then be responsible for administering the pay plan and any position classification plan in accordance with general policies and directives adopted by the council.

The council may purchase life, health, and any other forms of insurance for the benefit of all or any class of city employees and their dependents, and may provide other fringe benefits for city employees. In providing health insurance to city employees, the council shall not provide abortion coverage greater than that provided by the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees under Article 3B of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

History.

1923, c. 20; 1949, c. 103; 1969, c. 845; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, ss. 18, 19; 2013-366, s. 2(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-366, s. 2(c), effective July 29, 2013, added the second sentence in subsection (b). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 160A-163.
Retirement benefits.

The council may provide for enrolling city employees in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Benefit and Relief Fund, the Firemen’s Pension Fund, or a retirement plan certified to be actuarially sound by a qualified actuary as defined in subsection (d) of this section, and may make payments into any such retirement system or plan on behalf of its employees. The city may also supplement from local funds benefits provided by the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Benefit and Relief Fund, or the Firemen’s Pension Fund.

The council may create and administer a special fund for the relief of members of the police and fire departments who have been retired for age, or for disability or injury incurred in the line of duty, but any such funds established on or after January 1, 1972, shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. The council may receive donations and devises in aid of any such fund, shall provide for its permanence and increase, and shall prescribe and regulate the conditions under which benefits may be paid.

No city shall make payments into any retirement system or plan established or authorized by local act of the General Assembly unless the plan is certified to be actuarially sound by a qualified actuary as defined in subsection (d) of this section.

A qualified actuary means an individual certified as qualified by the Commissioner of Insurance, or any member of the American Academy of Actuaries.

A city which is providing health insurance under G.S. 160A-162(b) may provide health insurance for all or any class of former employees of the city who are receiving benefits under subsection (a) of this section or who are 65 years of age or older. Such health insurance may be paid entirely by the city, partly by the city and former employee, or entirely by the former employee, at the option of the city.

The council may provide a deferred compensation plan. Where the council provides a deferred compensation plan, the investment of funds for the plan shall be exempt from the provisions of G.S 159-30 and

G.S. 159-31

. Cities may invest deferred compensation plan funds in life insurance, fixed or variable annuities and retirement income contracts, regulated investment trusts, or other forms of investments approved by the Board of Trustees of the North Carolina Public Employee Deferred Compensation Plan.

Should the council provide for a retirement plan, a plan which supplements a State-administered plan, or a special fund, any benefits payable from such plan or fund on account of the disability of city employees may be restricted with regard to the amount which may be earned by the disabled former employee in any other employment, but only to the extent that the earnings of disability beneficiaries in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System are restricted in accordance with G.S. 128-27(e)(1).

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 5, s. 1; 1919, cc. 136, 237; C.S., s. 2787; 1965, c. 931; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1981, c. 347, s. 2; 1991, c. 277, s. 2; 1995, c. 259, s. 3; 2011-284, s. 111.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 111, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “devises” for “bequests” in the last sentence of subsection (b).

§ 160A-164.
Personnel rules.

The council may adopt or provide for rules and regulations or ordinances concerning but not limited to annual leave, sick leave, special leave with full pay or with partial pay supplementing workers’ compensation payments for employees injured in accidents arising out of and in the course of employment, hours of employment, holidays, working conditions, service award and incentive award programs, other personnel policies, and any other measures that promote the hiring and retention of capable, diligent, and honest career employees.

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 5, s. 1; 1919, cc. 136, 237; C.S., s. 2787; 1965, c. 931; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1979, c. 714, s. 2.

§ 160A-164.1.
Smallpox vaccination policy (see editor’s note on condition precedent).

All municipalities that employ firefighters, police officers, paramedics, or other first responders shall, not later than 90 days after this section becomes law, enact a policy regarding sick leave and salary continuation for those employees for absence from work due to an adverse medical reaction resulting from the employee receiving in employment vaccination against smallpox incident to the Administration of Smallpox Countermeasures by Health Professionals, section 304 of the Homeland Security Act, Pub. L. No. 107-296 (Nov. 25, 2002) (to be codified at 42 U.S.C. § 233(p)).

History.

2003-169, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to tort claims arising from certain smallpox vaccinations of State employees, see

G.S. 143-300.1

A.

Condition precedent to recovery.

Session Laws 2003-169, s. 7, provides: “In the event that federal regulatory or statutory provisions providing compensation and benefits to persons for infection with smallpox, infection with vaccinia, or any adverse medical reaction incident to the Administration of Smallpox Countermeasures by Health Professionals, section 304 of the Homeland Security Act, Pub. L. No. 107-296 (Nov. 25, 2002) (to be codified at 42 U.S.C. § 233(p)) are adopted, a condition precedent to recovery under this act shall be that the person claiming compensation and benefits under this act shall first seek compensation and benefits under the federal provisions, with those provisions constituting primary coverage and the person then being entitled to compensation and benefits under this act not exceeding a total recovery under the federal provisions and this act equal to the amount available under the applicable provisions of this act.”

The Smallpox Emergency Personnel Protection Act of 2003, Public Law 108-20, 117, Sta. 638, authorizes the Secretary of Health and Human Services to establish a Smallpox Vaccine Injury Compensation Program, which covers individuals immunized through January 23, 2005 or vaccina contacts who show symptoms by February 22, 2005.

§ 160A-164.2.
Criminal history record check of employees permitted.

The council may adopt or provide for rules and regulations or ordinances concerning a requirement that any applicant for employment be subject to a criminal history record check of State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories conducted by the Department of Public Safety in accordance with

G.S. 143B-945

. The city may consider the results of these criminal history record checks in its hiring decisions.

History.

2003-214, s. 5; 2014-100, s. 17.1(nnn).

Cross References.

As to criminal history record checks under the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, see

G.S. 143B-981

.

§ 160A-165.
Personnel board.

The council may establish a personnel board with authority to administer tests designed to determine the merit and fitness of candidates for appointment or promotion, to conduct hearings upon the appeal of employees who have been suspended, demoted, or discharged, and hear employee grievances.

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 5, s. 1; 1919, cc. 136, 237; C.S., s. 2787; 1965, c. 931; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-166.
Participation in Social Security Act.

The council may take any action necessary to allow city employees to participate fully in benefits provided by the federal Social Security Act.

History.

1949, c. 103; 1969, c. 845; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-167.
Defense of employees and officers; payment of judgments.

Upon request made by or in behalf of any member or former member of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, or authority employee or officer, or former employee or officer, any soil and water conservation supervisor or any local soil and water conservation employee, whether the employee is a district or county employee, or any member of a volunteer fire department or rescue squad which receives public funds, any city, authority, county, soil and water conservation district, or county alcoholic beverage control board may provide for the defense of any civil or criminal action or proceeding brought against him either in his official or in his individual capacity, or both, on account of any act done or omission made, or any act allegedly done or omission allegedly made, in the scope and course of his employment or duty as an employee or officer of the city, authority, county or county alcoholic beverage control board. The defense may be provided by the city, authority, county or county alcoholic beverage control board by its own counsel, or by employing other counsel, or by purchasing insurance which requires that the insurer provide the defense. Providing for a defense pursuant to this section is hereby declared to be for a public purpose, and the expenditure of funds therefor is hereby declared to be a necessary expense. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require any city, authority, county or county alcoholic beverage control board to provide for the defense of any action or proceeding of any nature.

Any city council or board of county commissioners may appropriate funds for the purpose of paying all or part of a claim made or any civil judgment entered against any of its members or former members of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, or authority employees or officers, or former employees or officers, or any soil and water conservation supervisor or any local soil and water conservation employee, whether the employee is a district or county employee, when such claim is made or such judgment is rendered as damages on account of any act done or omission made, or any act allegedly done or omission allegedly made, in the scope and course of his employment or duty as a member or former member of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, district, or authority employee or officer of the city, authority, district, or county; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall authorize any city, authority, district, or county to appropriate funds for the purpose of paying any claim made or civil judgment entered against any of its members or former members of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, district, or authority employees or officers or former employees or officers if the city council or board of county commissioners finds that such members or former members of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, or authority employee or officer acted or failed to act because of actual fraud, corruption or actual malice on his part. Any city, authority, or county may purchase insurance coverage for payment of claims or judgments pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require any city, authority, or county to pay any claim or judgment referred to herein, and the purchase of insurance coverage for payment of any such claim or judgment shall not be deemed an assumption of any liability not covered by such insurance contract, and shall not be deemed an assumption of liability for payment of any claim or judgment in excess of the limits of coverage in such insurance contract.

Subsection (b) shall not authorize any city, authority, or county to pay all or part of a claim made or civil judgment entered unless (1) notice of the claim or litigation is given to the city council, authority governing board, or board of county commissioners as the case may be prior to the time that the claim is settled or civil judgment is entered, and (2) the city council, authority governing board, or board of county commissioners as the case may be shall have adopted, and made available for public inspection, uniform standards under which claims made or civil judgments entered against members or former members of the governing body of any authority, or any city, county, or authority employees or officers, or former employees or officers, shall be paid.

For the purposes of this section, “authority” means an authority organized under Article 1 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes, the North Carolina Water and Sewer Authorities Act. “District” means a soil and water conservation district organized under Chapter 139 of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 1093; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 23; c. 1450; 1977, c. 307, s. 2; c. 834, s. 1; 1983, c. 525, ss. 1-4; 2001-300, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg: 1989, c. 151, s. 1; city of Charlotte: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 862.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the need for reform in North Carolina of local government sovereign immunity, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 43 (1982).

For comment, “Waiving Local Government Immunity in North Carolina: Risk Management Programs Are Insurance,” see 27 Wake Forest L. Rev. 709 (1992).

§ 160A-168.
Privacy of employee personnel records.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 132-6

or any other general law or local act concerning access to public records, personnel files of employees, former employees, or applicants for employment maintained by a city are subject to inspection and may be disclosed only as provided by this section. For purposes of this section, an employee’s personnel file consists of any information in any form gathered by the city with respect to that employee and, by way of illustration but not limitation, relating to his application, selection or nonselection, performance, promotions, demotions, transfers, suspension and other disciplinary actions, evaluation forms, leave, salary, and termination of employment. As used in this section, “employee” includes former employees of the city.

The following information with respect to each city employee is a matter of public record:

Name.

Age.

Date of original employment or appointment to the service.

The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the city has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession.

Current position.

Title.

Current salary.

Date and amount of each increase or decrease in salary with that municipality.

Date and type of each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation, or other change in position classification with that municipality.

Date and general description of the reasons for each promotion with that municipality.

Date and type of each dismissal, suspension, or demotion for disciplinary reasons taken by the municipality. If the disciplinary action was a dismissal, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the municipality setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.

The office to which the employee is currently assigned.

(b1)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “salary” includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of compensation paid by the employing entity.

(b2)

The city council shall determine in what form and by whom this information will be maintained. Any person may have access to this information for the purpose of inspection, examination, and copying, during regular business hours, subject only to such rules and regulations for the safekeeping of public records as the city council may have adopted. Any person denied access to this information may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for an order compelling disclosure, and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue such orders.

All information contained in a city employee’s personnel file, other than the information made public by subsection (b) of this section, is confidential and shall be open to inspection only in the following instances:

The employee or his duly authorized agent may examine all portions of his personnel file except (i) letters of reference solicited prior to employment, and (ii) information concerning a medical disability, mental or physical, that a prudent physician would not divulge to his patient.

A licensed physician designated in writing by the employee may examine the employee’s medical record.

A city employee having supervisory authority over the employee may examine all material in the employee’s personnel file.

By order of a court of competent jurisdiction, any person may examine such portion of an employee’s personnel file as may be ordered by the court.

An official of an agency of the State or federal government, or any political subdivision of the State, may inspect any portion of a personnel file when such inspection is deemed by the official having custody of such records to be inspected to be necessary and essential to the pursuance of a proper function of the inspecting agency, but no information shall be divulged for the purpose of assisting in a criminal prosecution (of the employee), or for the purpose of assisting in an investigation of (the employee’s) tax liability. However, the official having custody of such records may release the name, address, and telephone number from a personnel file for the purpose of assisting in a criminal investigation.

An employee may sign a written release, to be placed with his personnel file, that permits the person with custody of the file to provide, either in person, by telephone, or by mail, information specified in the release to prospective employers, educational institutions, or other persons specified in the release.

The city manager, with concurrence of the council, or, in cities not having a manager, the council may inform any person of the employment or nonemployment, promotion, demotion, suspension or other disciplinary action, reinstatement, transfer, or termination of a city employee and the reasons for that personnel action. Before releasing the information, the manager or council shall determine in writing that the release is essential to maintaining public confidence in the administration of city services or to maintaining the level and quality of city services. This written determination shall be retained in the office of the manager or the city clerk, and is a record available for public inspection and shall become part of the employee’s personnel file.

(c1)

Even if considered part of an employee’s personnel file, the following information need not be disclosed to an employee nor to any other person:

(1)

Testing or examination material used solely to determine individual qualifications for appointment, employment, or promotion in the city’s service, when disclosure would compromise the objectivity or the fairness of the testing or examination process.

(2)

Investigative reports or memoranda and other information concerning the investigation of possible criminal actions of an employee, until the investigation is completed and no criminal action taken, or until the criminal action is concluded.

(3)

Information that might identify an undercover law enforcement officer or a law enforcement informer.

(4)

Notes, preliminary drafts and internal communications concerning an employee. In the event such materials are used for any official personnel decision, then the employee or his duly authorized agent shall have a right to inspect such materials.

(c2)

The city council may permit access, subject to limitations they may impose, to selected personnel files by a professional representative of a training, research, or academic institution if that person certifies that he will not release information identifying the employees whose files are opened and that the information will be used solely for statistical, research, or teaching purposes. This certification shall be retained by the city as long as each personnel file examined is retained.

(c3)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-108, s. 2(h), effective July 22, 2016.

(c4)

Even if considered part of an employee’s personnel file, the following information regarding any sworn law enforcement officer shall not be disclosed to an employee or any other person, unless disclosed in accordance with

G.S. 132-1.4

, or in accordance with

G.S. 132-1.10

, or for the personal safety of that sworn law enforcement officer or any other person residing in the same residence:

(1)

Information that might identify the residence of a sworn law enforcement officer.

(2)

Emergency contact information.

(3)

Any identifying information as defined in

G.S. 14-113.20

.

The city council of a city that maintains personnel files containing information other than the information mentioned in subsection (b) of this section shall establish procedures whereby an employee who objects to material in his file on grounds that it is inaccurate or misleading may seek to have the material removed from the file or may place in the file a statement relating to the material.

A public official or employee who knowingly, willfully, and with malice permits any person to have access to information contained in a personnel file, except as is permitted by this section, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined an amount not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Any person, not specifically authorized by this section to have access to a personnel file designated as confidential, who shall knowingly and willfully examine in its official filing place, remove or copy any portion of a confidential personnel file shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined in the discretion of the court but not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

1975, c. 701, s. 2; 1981, c. 926, ss. 1-4; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1084, 1085; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2007-508, s. 7; 2008-194, s. 11(e); 2010-169, s. 18(f); 2015-225, s. 2; 2016-108, s. 2(h).

Local Modification.

City of Charlotte: 1997-305, s. 3; city of Durham: 1998-142, s. 1; city of Greensboro: 2001-20; 2018-105, s. 2(a); city of Wilmington: 2003-238, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-508, s. 7, effective August 30, 2007, in subsection (b), inserted “the terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the city has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Session Laws 2008-194, s. 11(e), effective August 8, 2008, added subsection (c3).

Session Laws 2010-169, s. 18(f), effective October 1, 2010, subdivided subsection (b), adding the subdivision designations and making multiple stylistic changes; in subdivision (b)(8), substituted “each increase or decrease in salary with that municipality” for “most recent increase or decrease in salary”; in subdivision (b)(9), substituted “Date and type of each promotion” for “date of the most recent promotion,” and added “with that municipality”; added subdivisions (b)(10) and (b)(11); and added the subsection (b1) and (b2) designations.

Session Laws 2015-225, s. 2, effective October 1, 2015, added subsection (c4).

Session Laws 2016-108, s. 2(h), effective July 22, 2016, repealed subsection (c3).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “You Can’t Always Get What You Want: A Look at North Carolina’s Public Records Law,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1527 (1994).

For article, “Fired by Liars: Due Process Implications in the Recent Changes to North Carolina’s Public Disclosure Laws,” see 89 N.C.L. Rev. 2228 (2011).

§ 160A-169.
City employee political activity.

Purpose. The purpose of this section is to ensure that city employees are not subjected to political or partisan coercion while performing their job duties, to ensure that employees are not restricted from political activities while off duty, and to ensure that public funds are not used for political or partisan activities.It is not the purpose of this section to allow infringement upon the rights of employees to engage in free speech and free association. Every city employee has a civic responsibility to support good government by every available means and in every appropriate manner. Employees shall not be restricted from affiliating with civic organizations of a partisan or political nature, nor shall employees, while off duty, be restricted from attending political meetings, or advocating and supporting the principles or policies of civic or political organizations, or supporting partisan or nonpartisan candidates of their choice in accordance with the Constitution and laws of the State and the Constitution and laws of the United States of America.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section:

“City employee” or “employee” means any person employed by a city or any department or program thereof that is supported, in whole or in part, by city funds;

“On duty” means that time period when an employee is engaged in the duties of his or her employment; and

“Workplace” means any place where an employee engages in his or her job duties.

No employee while on duty or in the workplace may:

Use his or her official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the result of an election or nomination for political office; or

Coerce, solicit, or compel contributions for political or partisan purposes by another employee.

No employee may be required as a duty or condition of employment, promotion, or tenure of office to contribute funds for political or partisan purposes.

No employee may use city funds, supplies, or equipment for partisan purposes, or for political purposes except where such political uses are otherwise permitted by law.

To the extent that this section conflicts with the provisions of any local act, city charter, local ordinance, resolution, or policy, this section prevails to the extent of the conflict.

History.

1991, c. 619, s. 2; 1993, c. 298, s. 2.

§ 160A-169.1.
Municipality verification of employee work authorization.

Municipalities Must Use E-Verify. — Each municipality shall register and participate in E-Verify to verify the work authorization of new employees hired to work in the United States.

E-Verify Defined. — As used in this section, the term “E-Verify” means the federal E-Verify program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security and other federal agencies, or any successor or equivalent program used to verify the work authorization of newly hired employees pursuant to federal law.

Nondiscrimination. — This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.

History.

2011-263, s. 5.

§ 160A-170.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. City Clerk.

§ 160A-171.
City clerk; duties.

There shall be a city clerk who shall give notice of meetings of the council, keep a journal of the proceedings of the council, be the custodian of all city records, and shall perform any other duties that may be required by law or the council.

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 13, s. 1; C.S., s. 2826; 1941, c. 103; 1949, c. 14; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-172.
Deputy clerk.

The council may provide for a deputy city clerk who shall have full authority to exercise and perform any of the powers and duties of the city clerk that may be specified by the council.

History.

1917, c. 136, subch. 13, s. 1; C.S., s. 2826; 1941, c. 103; 1949, c. 14; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Part 6. City Attorney.

§ 160A-173.
City attorney; appointment and duties.

The council shall appoint a city attorney to serve at its pleasure and to be its legal adviser.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.